Virginia statutes. Title 44. Military and Emergency Laws.
Chapter 3.2. Emergency Services and Disaster Law.

§ 44-146.13.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Commonwealth of Virginia Emergency Services and Disaster Law of 2000.”

History.

1973, c. 260; 2000, c. 309.

Cross references.

As to postponement of certain elections during state of emergency, see §

24.2-603.1

.

As to emergency situations at polling locations, see §

24.2-604.2

.

As to emergency authority of the Secretary of the State Board of Elections, see §

24.2-713

.

As to extension to file reports required under the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act, §

24.2-945

et seq., in emergency situations, see §

24.2-946.4

.

As to authority of State Health Commissioner to issue order of quarantine or order of isolation, see §§

32.1-48.09

,

32.1-48.012

, respectively. As to waiver of requirements by Board of Pharmacy during disaster or state of emergency, see §

54.1-3307.3

.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 substituted “2000” for “1973.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia administrative law for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1632 (1975).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

12B M.J. Military, § 2.

§ 44-146.14.
Findings of General Assembly.

Because of the ever present possibility of the occurrence of disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting from enemy attack, sabotage or other hostile action, resource shortage, or from fire, flood, earthquake, or other natural causes, and in order to insure that preparations of the Commonwealth and its political subdivisions will be adequate to deal with such emergencies, and generally to provide for the common defense and to protect the public peace, health, and safety, and to preserve the lives and property and economic well-being of the people of the Commonwealth, it is hereby found and declared to be necessary and to be the purpose of this chapter:

To create a State Department of Emergency Management, and to authorize the creation of local organizations for emergency management in the political subdivisions of the Commonwealth;

To confer upon the Governor and upon the executive heads or governing bodies of the political subdivisions of the Commonwealth emergency powers provided herein; and

To provide for rendering of mutual aid among the political subdivisions of the Commonwealth and with other states and to cooperate with the federal government with respect to the carrying out of emergency service functions.

It is further declared to be the purpose of this chapter and the policy of the Commonwealth that all emergency service functions of the Commonwealth be coordinated to the maximum extent possible with the comparable functions of the federal government, other states, and private agencies of every type, and that the Governor shall be empowered to provide for enforcement by the Commonwealth of national emergency services programs, to the end that the most effective preparation and use may be made of the nation’s resources and facilities for dealing with any disaster that may occur.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 2000, c. 309.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309, in subdivision (a)(1), substituted “Emergency Management” for “Emergency Services” twice; and added “and” at the end of subdivision (a)(2).

§ 44-146.15.
Construction of chapter.

Nothing in this chapter is to be construed to:

Limit, modify, or abridge the authority of the Governor to exercise any powers vested in him under other laws of this Commonwealth independent of, or in conjunction with, any provisions of this chapter;

Interfere with dissemination of news or comment on public affairs; but any communications facility or organization, including, but not limited to, radio and television stations, wire services, and newspapers, may be required to transmit or print public service messages furnishing information or instructions in connection with actual or pending disaster;

Empower the Governor, any political subdivision, or any other governmental authority to in any way limit or prohibit the rights of the people to keep and bear arms as guaranteed by Article I, Section 13 of the Constitution of Virginia or the Second Amendment of the Constitution of the United States, including the otherwise lawful possession, carrying, transportation, sale, or transfer of firearms except to the extent necessary to ensure public safety in any place or facility designated or used by the Governor, any political subdivision of the Commonwealth, or any other governmental entity as an emergency shelter or for the purpose of sheltering persons;

Affect the jurisdiction or responsibilities of police forces, firefighting forces, units of the armed forces of the United States or any personnel thereof, when on active duty; but state, local and interjurisdictional agencies for emergency services shall place reliance upon such forces in the event of declared disasters; or

Interfere with the course of conduct of a labor dispute except that actions otherwise authorized by this chapter or other laws may be taken when necessary to forestall or mitigate imminent or existing danger to public health or safety.

History.

1973, c. 260; 2000, c. 309; 2006, c. 458; 2012, cc. 42, 158.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 added “or” at the end of subdivision (3).

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 458 inserted subdivision (3) and redesignated former subdivisions (3) and (4) as subdivisions (4) and (5).

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 42 and 158 are identical, and inserted “or prohibit,” “otherwise” and “carrying, transportation” in subdivision (3), and substituted “fire fighting” for “fire-fighting” in subdivision (4).

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

Applicability. —

By virtue of Va. Code Ann. Title 44 including limiting provisions, it is clear that § 44-146.15 (3) applies to the Governor of Virginia. To hold otherwise would render the provision entirely moot. However, the plain language of the statute also applies to any political subdivision, or any other governmental authority. Ergo, the plain language of the statute similarly makes clear that the Governor is not absolved of limitations by joining with another figure in the issuance of an executive order. Rather, the limiting language encompasses both the Governor and any joining entity. For this reason, § 44-146.15 (3) applies equally to the Governor and the Virginia State Health Commissioner. SEG Props., L.L.C. v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 216, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 83 (Loudoun County June 10, 2020).

Motion for temporary injunction was properly denied where the executive orders issued in response to the COVID-19 pandemic prohibiting public access to indoor shooting ranges did not impermissibly infringe on the right to bear arms as protected by Va. Const., Art. I, § 13, and § 44-146.15 (3). SEG Props., L.L.C. v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 216, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 83 (Loudoun County June 10, 2020).

Plain language of the Virginia Constitution and the statutory protections afford the people the right to bear arms and such protection extends to the right to train therewith. That protection, however, does not extend to businesses such as indoor shooting ranges. SEG Props., L.L.C. v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 216, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 83 (Loudoun County June 10, 2020).

Shooting at a range was a lawful activity. —

Section § 44-146.15 (3)’s protection extended to gun ranges as the term “bear arms” included loading and shooting at a gun range, the statute listed activities pertaining to the lawful use of firearms, and shooting at a range was a lawful activity in the Commonwealth. Lynchburg Range & Training, LLC v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 159, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 57 (Lynchburg Apr. 27, 2020).

Power to close whole categories of businesses. —

Governor’s power to close whole categories of businesses came from only §

44-146.17

, which was constrained by § 44-146.15(3), as Title 32.1 did not grant the Governor the authority to shut down whole categories of businesses without declaring a state of emergency, and his duty to take care that the laws be faithfully executed included the laws that limited his power during emergencies like § 44-146.15(3). Lynchburg Range & Training, LLC v. Northam, 105 Va. Cir. 159, 2020 Va. Cir. LEXIS 57 (Lynchburg Apr. 27, 2020).

§ 44-146.16.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Communicable disease of public health threat”
means an illness of public health significance, as determined by the State Health Commissioner in accordance with regulations of the Board of Health, caused by a specific or suspected infectious agent that may be reasonably expected or is known to be readily transmitted directly or indirectly from one individual to another and has been found to create a risk of death or significant injury or impairment; this definition shall not, however, be construed to include human immunodeficiency viruses or tuberculosis, unless used as a bioterrorism weapon. “Individual” shall include any companion animal. Further, whenever “person or persons” is used in Article 3.02 (§

32.1-48.05

et seq.) of Chapter 2 of Title 32.1, it shall be deemed, when the context requires it, to include any individual.

“Cyber incident”
means an event occurring on or conducted through a computer network that actually or imminently jeopardizes the integrity, confidentiality, or availability of computers, information or communications systems or networks, physical or virtual infrastructure controlled by computers or information systems, or information resident thereon. “Cyber incident” includes a vulnerability in information systems, system security procedures, internal controls, or implementations that could be exploited by a threat source.

“Disaster”
means (i) any man-made disaster, including any condition following an attack by any enemy or foreign nation upon the United States resulting in substantial damage of property or injury to persons in the United States including by use of bombs, missiles, shell fire, or nuclear, radiological, chemical, or biological means or other weapons or by overt paramilitary actions; terrorism, foreign and domestic; cyber incidents; and any industrial, nuclear, or transportation accident, explosion, conflagration, power failure, resources shortage, or other condition such as sabotage, oil spills, and other injurious environmental contaminations that threaten or cause damage to property, human suffering, hardship, or loss of life and (ii) any natural disaster, including any hurricane, tornado, storm, flood, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, earthquake, drought, fire, communicable disease of public health threat, or other natural catastrophe resulting in damage, hardship, suffering, or possible loss of life.

“Discharge”
means spillage, leakage, pumping, pouring, seepage, emitting, dumping, emptying, injecting, escaping, leaching, fire, explosion, or other releases.

“Emergency”
means any occurrence, or threat thereof, whether natural or man-made, which results or may result in substantial injury or harm to the population or substantial damage to or loss of property or natural resources and may involve governmental action beyond that authorized or contemplated by existing law because governmental inaction for the period required to amend the law to meet the exigency would work immediate and irrevocable harm upon the citizens or the environment of the Commonwealth or some clearly defined portion or portions thereof.

“Emergency services”
means the preparation for and the carrying out of functions, other than functions for which military forces are primarily responsible, to prevent, minimize, and repair injury and damage resulting from disasters, together with all other activities necessary or incidental to the preparation for and carrying out of the foregoing functions. These functions include, without limitation, firefighting services, police services, medical and health services, rescue, engineering, warning services, communications, radiological, chemical, and other special weapons defense, evacuation of persons from stricken areas, emergency welfare services, emergency transportation, emergency resource management, existing or properly assigned functions of plant protection, temporary restoration of public utility services, and other functions related to civilian protection. These functions also include the administration of approved state and federal disaster recovery and assistance programs.

“Hazard mitigation”
means any action taken to reduce or eliminate the long-term risk to human life and property from natural hazards.

“Hazardous substances”
means all materials or substances that now or hereafter are designated, defined, or characterized as hazardous by law or regulation of the Commonwealth or regulation of the United States government.

“Interjurisdictional agency for emergency management”
is any organization established between contiguous political subdivisions to facilitate the cooperation and protection of the subdivisions in the work of disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery.

“Local emergency”
means the condition declared by the local governing body when in its judgment the threat or actual occurrence of an emergency or disaster is or threatens to be of sufficient severity and magnitude to warrant coordinated local government action to prevent or alleviate the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering threatened or caused thereby, provided, however, that a local emergency arising wholly or substantially out of a resource shortage may be declared only by the Governor, upon petition of the local governing body, when he deems the threat or actual occurrence of such an emergency or disaster to be of sufficient severity and magnitude to warrant coordinated local government action to prevent or alleviate the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering threatened or caused thereby, and provided, however, nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting a local governing body from the prudent management of its water supply to prevent or manage a water shortage.

“Local emergency management organization”
means an organization created in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by local authority to perform local emergency service functions.

“Major disaster”
means any natural catastrophe, including any: hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm, or drought, or regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion, in any part of the United States, which, in the determination of the President of the United States is, or thereafter determined to be, of sufficient severity and magnitude to warrant major disaster assistance under the Stafford Act (P.L. 93-288 as amended) to supplement the efforts and available resources of states, local governments, and disaster relief organizations in alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering caused thereby and is so declared by him.

“Political subdivision”
means any city or county in the Commonwealth and, for the purposes of this chapter, the Town of Chincoteague and any town of more than 5,000 population that chooses to have an emergency management program separate from that of the county in which such town is located.

“Resource shortage”
means the absence, unavailability, or reduced supply of any raw or processed natural resource or any commodities, goods, or services of any kind that bear a substantial relationship to the health, safety, welfare, and economic well-being of the citizens of the Commonwealth.

“State of emergency”
means the condition declared by the Governor when in his judgment the threat or actual occurrence of an emergency or a disaster in any part of the Commonwealth is of sufficient severity and magnitude to warrant disaster assistance by the Commonwealth to supplement the efforts and available resources of the several localities and relief organizations in preventing or alleviating the damage, loss, hardship, or suffering threatened or caused thereby and is so declared by him.

History.

1973, c. 260; 1974, c. 4; 1975, c. 11; 1978, c. 60; 1979, c. 193; 1981, c. 116; 1984, c. 743; 1993, c. 671; 2000, c. 309; 2004, cc. 773, 1021; 2008, cc. 121, 157; 2020, c. 483.

Cross references.

As to liability protection for health care providers during disasters, see §

8.01-225.02

.

For the Line of Duty Act, see §§

9.1-400

et seq.

As to declaration of a judicial emergency, see §

17.1-330

.

As to crisis and emergency management plans for educational institutions, see §

23.1-804

.

For provision authorizing the Governor to waive certain statutory mandates and regulations to expedite certain highway construction projects in order to meet certain emergencies, see §

33.2-101

.

As to Virginia Post-Disaster Anti-Price Gouging Act, see § 59.1-525 et seq.

As to workers’ compensation coverage for first responders in off-duty capacity during state of emergency, see §

65.2-104

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2004, cc. 773 and 1021, cl. 2 provides: “That the Board of Health shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act to be effective within 280 days of its enactment.”

Acts 2015, cc. 16 and 338, cl. 1 provides: “The Department of Transportation, Department of Mines, Minerals and Energy, Department of Emergency Management, Department of Motor Vehicles, Department of State Police, and other interested stakeholders shall work to establish a protocol for submission of a declaration of a state of emergency for resource shortages, as defined in § 44-146.16 of the Code of Virginia, that adversely affect the delivery of motor fuels, gasoline, diesel, kerosene, number one and two heating oils, or liquid propane gas within or outside of the Commonwealth.”

Acts 2015, cc. 16 and 338, cl. 2 provides: “That the Department of Emergency Management shall submit a report detailing the established protocol to the Governor and the General Assembly by January 13, 2016.”

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 309 inserted “terrorism, foreign and domestic” near the middle of subdivision (2); in subdivision (2a), substituted “any occurrence, or threat thereof, whether natural or man-made, which results or may result in substantial injury or harm to the population or substantial damage to or loss of property or natural resources and may involve” for “a sudden and unforeseeable occurrence or condition, either as to its onset or as to its extent, of such disastrous severity or magnitude that,” deleted “is required” following “existing law,” and inserted “or the environment”; in subdivision (4), substituted “catastrophe, including any: hurricane, tornado, storm, high water, wind-driven water, tidal wave, tsunami, earthquake, volcanic eruption, landslide, mudslide, snowstorm or drought, or regardless of cause, any fire, flood, or explosion” for “or man-made disaster,” substituted “warrant major disaster assistance under the Stafford Act (P.L. 43-288 as amended) to supplement the efforts and available resources of the several states, local governments, and disaster relief” for “warrant disaster assistance above and beyond emergency services by the federal government to supplement the efforts and available resources of the several states, local governments, and relief”; in subdivision (5), inserted “an emergency or” near the middle, and deleted “when it is evident that the resources of the Commonwealth are adequate to cope with such disasters” at the end; in subdivision (6), substituted “of an, emergency or disaster” for ”of a disaster” near the beginning, substituted “of such an emergency or disaster” for “of a disaster” near the middle, and substituted “supply to prevent or manage a water shortage” for “supply, in the absence of a declared state of emergency, to prevent a water shortage” at the end; in subdivision (7), inserted “management”; in subdivisions (8) and (9), substituted “emergency management” for “emergency services”; and added subdivision (13).

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 773, effective April 12, 2004, and 1021, effective April 21, 2004, are nearly identical, and rewrote the section. The definition of “Communicable disease of public health threat” is set out above as directed by the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 121 and 157 are identical, and inserted the paragraph defining “Disaster,” deleted “natural or man-made” preceding “disasters” in the first sentence of the paragraph defining “Emergency services,” substituted “Stafford Act (P.L. 93-288” for “Strafford Act (P.L. 43-288” in the paragraph defining “Major disaster,” and deleted the former paragraphs defining “Man-made disaster” and “Natural disaster.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 481, added the definition for “Cyber incident”; in the definition for “Disaster,” substituted “including by use” for “and may be by use” and substituted “cyber incidents; and” for “also” in “Hazardous substances,” substituted “that” for “which”; and made stylistic changes.

Law Review.

For note, “Federal and State Remedies to Clean Up Hazardous Waste Sites,” see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 379 (1986).